Utah statutes.
78B-6-1313.   Temporary injunction in actions involving title to mining
claims.
(1)  The court may grant a postponement if:
(a)  the court is satisfied that the delay is necessary for either or both
parties to adequately prepare for trial; and
(b)  the party requesting the postponement is not guilty of laches and is
acting in good faith.
(2)  The court may provide, as part of its order, that the party obtaining the
postponement may not remove from the property which is the subject of the
action any valuable quartz, rock, earth, or ores.  The court may vacate the
postponement order or hold the party in contempt if the order is violated.
